Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2518.04
Transfer of employees; credit for time of service; seniority.

(1) A transferred employee shall be credited for time of service with the state or a political subdivision toward the probationary period in the county:

(a) A transferred employee whose credited time of service with the state or a political subdivision does not satisfy the county's probationary period time requirement shall be a probationary employee of the county and afforded the same rights, benefits, and privileges as are afforded to a probationary employee under the county personnel system; and

(b) A transferred employee whose credited time of service with the state or a political subdivision does not satisfy the county's probationary period time requirement shall successfully complete the remainder of the county's probationary period time requirement before being given status with the county.

(2) Transferred employees shall retain seniority accumulated during service with the state or a political subdivision, and no transferred employee shall lose accumulated seniority as a result of becoming a county employee.

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 12.